Hawaii statutes.
[§321-193.7] Clean and sober homes
registry. (a) The department shall establish a voluntary clean and sober
homes registry to assist persons recovering from substance abuse to have a
safe, clean, and sober environment that supports their recovery. The
department shall establish procedures and standards by which homes will be
allowed to be listed on the registry, including but not limited to:

(1) Organizational and administrative standards;

(2) Fiscal management standards;

(3) Operation standards;

(4) Recovery support standards;

(5) Property standards; and

(6) Good neighbor standards.

(b) Upon review and approval of a home
operator's application, the department shall issue a certificate of
registration that shall specify:

(1) The name of the holder of the registration;

(2) The address to which the registration applies;

(3) The maximum number of persons to reside in the
home; and

(4) The period for which the registration shall be
valid.

An owner, operator, or landlord shall not hold the
property out to be or advertise to be a "registered clean and sober
home" unless the home is registered and in good standing with the clean
and sober homes registry.

(c) The certificate of registration shall be
publicly displayed at the home.

(d) The certificate of registration shall not
be transferred to a new owner or operator, or to an address other than as
specified on the certificate of registration.

(e) Nothing in this section shall relieve a
certificate holder from compliance with other pertinent statutory provisions,
nor shall a certificate holder be relieved from compliance with other
applicable provisions of federal, state, or county laws, ordinances, or rules.

(f) The department may revoke the certificate
of registration if a home ceases to meet established standards or any other
applicable federal, state, or county law, ordinance, or rule.

(g) The department may immediately revoke a
certificate of registration if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the
continued operation of the home presents an immediate danger to residents of
the home or the general public.

(h) Any revocation of the certificate of
registration shall be made in writing to the certificate holder.

(i) The department shall maintain a listing of
all registered clean and sober homes on its website.

(j) The department shall establish a toll-free
telephone number to receive complaints regarding clean and sober homes.

(k) This section shall not be construed to
abrogate an individual's right to privacy. Unless otherwise provided by law,
the department shall implement sufficient protections to ensure that the
identity of a clean and sober home resident remains confidential and that
information collected pursuant to this section is used solely for the purposes
of this section.

(l) The department shall adopt rules under
chapter 91 as necessary to carry out the purposes of this section. [L 2014, c
193, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next